Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-617
Licensee; solicitor's certificate; appeal; effect.

Pending final determination of an appeal as provided in section 45-616, the holder of a license or the holder of a solicitor's certificate shall be permitted to do business as a collection agency or as a collection agency solicitor the same as though such license or certificate was in full force and effect.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 21, p. 1602;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,178;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 17.